src/date-sjd.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ===================== !
! The Kildin Sámi dates !
! ===================== !


! 12.8.
! поаррькманн кӯххтэмплоагант пе̄ййв

Multichar_Symbols

@U.MONTH.1@ 
@U.MONTH.2@ 
@U.MONTH.3@ 
@U.MONTH.4@ 
@U.MONTH.5@ 
@U.MONTH.6@ 
@U.MONTH.7@ 
@U.MONTH.8@ 
@U.MONTH.9@ 
@U.MONTH.10@ 
@U.MONTH.11@ 
@U.MONTH.12@ 

+Use/NG ! For substandard month names used in Oahpa
        ! They will be accepted but not generated.



LEXICON Root

 @U.MONTH.1@:о̄дтыгьманн% @U.MONTH.1@      31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.2@:по̄рркманн% @U.MONTH.2@       29DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.3@:нюххчманн% @U.MONTH.3@       31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.4@:кӯньтхемьманн% @U.MONTH.4@   30DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.5@:кыдтманн% @U.MONTH.5@        31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.6@:ке̄ссьманн% @U.MONTH.6@       30DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.7@:сӯйнкоссэманн% @U.MONTH.7@   31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.7@:сӯйнманн+Use/NG% @U.MONTH.7@ 31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.8@:поаррькманн% @U.MONTH.8@     31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.9@:че̄ххчманн% @U.MONTH.9@        30DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.10@:рэ̄гкэмманн% @U.MONTH.10@    31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.11@:ӣӈӈманн% @U.MONTH.11@        30DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.12@:та̄лльвманн% @U.MONTH.12@     31DAYS ;


LEXICON 29DAYS


1   B ;
2   B ;
3   B ;
4   B ;
5   B ;
6   B ;
7   B ;
8   B ;
9   B ;
1%0 B ;
11  B ;
12  B ;
13  B ;
14  B ;
15  B ;
16  B ;
17  B ;
18  B ;
19  B ;
2%0 B ;
21  B ;
22  B ;
23  B ;
24  B ;
25  B ;
26  B ;
27  B ;
28  B ;
29  B ;

! Commenting out numeric-to-letter day, for Oahpa.
! Comment in again for use in TTS applications.

! 1:авьтмусс% 		     B ;
! 2:ныммьп% 			     B ;
! 3:куалмант% 		     B ;
! 4:ня̄льянт% 		         B ;
! 5:выдант% 			     B ;
! 6:кудант% 			     B ;
! 7:кыджянт% 			     B ;
! 8:ка̄хцант% 			     B ;
! 9:ахцант% 			     B ;
! 1%0:лоагант% 		     B ;
! 11:э̄ххтэмплоагант% 	     B ;
! 12:кӯххтэмплоагант%      B ;
! 13:ко̄ллмэмплоагант%      B ;
! 14:не̄лльемплоагант%      B ;
! 15:выдтэмплоагант%       B ;
! 16:кудтэмплоагант%       B ;
! 17:кыджемплоагант%       B ;
! 18:ка̄ххцэмплоагант%      B ;
! 19:аххцэмплоагант%       B ;
! 2%0:кӯххтлоагант% 	     B ;
! 21:кӯххтлоагкьа̄вьтма%   B ;
! 22:кӯххтлоагкьныммьп%   B ;
! 23:кӯххтлоагкькуалмант%  B ;
! 24:кӯххтлоагкьня̄льянт%  B ;
! 25:кӯххтлоагкьвыдант%   B ;
! 26:кӯххтлоагкькудант%   B ;
! 27:кӯххтлоагкькыджянт%  B ;
! 28:кӯххтлоагкька̄хцант%  B ;
! 29:кӯххтлоагкьахцант%   B ;

LEXICON 30DAYS
3%0 B ;
!3%0:ко̄ллмлоагант% 	     B ;
29DAYS ;

LEXICON 31DAYS
31 B ;
!31:ко̄ллмлоагкь% а̄вьтма%   B ;
30DAYS ;


LEXICON B
%.:пе̄ййв%  MONTH ;

LEXICON MONTH
   1@U.MONTH.1@:@U.MONTH.1@   X ;
   2@U.MONTH.2@:@U.MONTH.2@   X ;
   3@U.MONTH.3@:@U.MONTH.3@   X ;
   4@U.MONTH.4@:@U.MONTH.4@   X ;
   5@U.MONTH.5@:@U.MONTH.5@   X ;
   6@U.MONTH.6@:@U.MONTH.6@   X ;
   7@U.MONTH.7@:@U.MONTH.7@   X ;
   8@U.MONTH.8@:@U.MONTH.8@   X ;
   9@U.MONTH.9@:@U.MONTH.9@   X ;
1%0@U.MONTH.10@:@U.MONTH.10@  X ;
 11@U.MONTH.11@:@U.MONTH.11@  X ;
 12@U.MONTH.12@:@U.MONTH.12@  X ;

LEXICON X
%.: # ;
!    # ; ! sloppy punctuation
